Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.200

Rights and duties of licensees—Reports to department.

Each licensee shall report information to the department at such times and as may be reasonably required by the department for the necessary enforcement and supervision of a sound, reasonable, and efficient commodity inspection program for the protection of depositors of commodities and for persons or agencies who deal in commodities.

[ 1983 c 305 s 37; 1963 c 124 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.